Utah statutes.
13-42-119.   Form and contents of agreement.
(1)  An agreement must:
(a)  be in a record;
(b)  be dated and signed by the provider and the individual;
(c)  include the name of the individual and the address where the individual
resides;
(d)  include the name, business address, and telephone number of the provider;
(e)  be delivered to the individual immediately upon formation of the
agreement; and
(f)  disclose:
(i)  the services to be provided;
(ii)  the amount, or method of determining the amount, of all fees,
individually itemized, to be paid by the individual;
(iii)  the schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the individual,
including the amount of each payment, the date on which each payment is due,
and an estimate of the date of the final payment;
(iv)  if a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors:
(A)  each creditor of the individual to which payment will be made, the amount
owed to each creditor, and any concessions the provider reasonably believes
each creditor will offer; and
(B)  the schedule of expected payments to each creditor, including the amount
of each payment and the date on which it will be made;
(v)  each creditor that the provider believes will not participate in the plan
and to which the provider will not direct payment;
(vi)  how the provider will comply with its obligations under Subsection
13-42-127(1);
(vii)  that the provider may terminate the agreement for good cause, upon
return of unexpended money of the individual;
(viii)  that the individual may cancel the agreement as provided in Section
13-42-120;
(ix)  that the individual may contact the administrator with any questions or
complaints regarding the provider; and
(x)  the address, telephone number, and Internet address or website of the
administrator.
(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(e), delivery of an electronic record
occurs when it is made available in a format in which the individual may
retrieve, save, and print it and the individual is notified that it is
available.
(3)  If the administrator supplies the provider with any information required
under Subsection (1)(f)(x), the provider may comply with that requirement only
by disclosing the information supplied by the administrator.
(4)  An agreement must provide that:
(a)  the individual has a right to terminate the agreement at any time,
without penalty or obligation, by giving the provider written or electronic
notice, in which event:
(i)  the provider will refund all unexpended money that the provider or its
agent has received from or on behalf of the individual for the reduction or
satisfaction of the individual's debt;
(ii)  with respect to an agreement that contemplates that creditors will
settle debts for less than the principal amount of debt, the provider will
refund 65% of any portion of the set-up fee that has not been credited against
the settlement fee; and
(iii)  all powers of attorney granted by the individual to the provider are
revoked and ineffective;
(b)  the individual authorizes any bank in which the provider or its agent has
established a trust account to disclose to the administrator any financial
records relating to the trust account; and
(c)  the provider will notify the individual within five days after learning
of a creditor's final decision to reject or withdraw from a plan and that this
notice will include:
(i)  the identity of the creditor; and
(ii)  the right of the individual to modify or terminate the agreement.
(5)  An agreement may confer on a provider a power of attorney to settle the
individual's debt for no more than 50% of the principal amount of the debt.
An agreement may not confer a power of attorney to settle a debt for more than
50% of that amount, but may confer a power of attorney to negotiate with
creditors of the individual on behalf of the individual.  An agreement must
provide that the provider will obtain the assent of the individual after a
creditor has assented to a settlement for more than 50% of the principal
amount of the debt.
(6)  An agreement may not:
(a)  provide for application of the law of any jurisdiction other than the
United States and this state;
(b)  except as permitted by Section 2 of the Federal Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C.
Section 2, or Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform Arbitration Act, contain a
provision that modifies or limits otherwise available forums or procedural
rights, including the right to trial by jury, that are generally available to
the individual under law other than this chapter;
(c)  contain a provision that restricts the individual's remedies under this
chapter or law other than this chapter; or
(d)  contain a provision that:
(i)  limits or releases the liability of any person for not performing the
agreement or for violating this chapter; or
(ii)  indemnifies any person for liability arising under the agreement or this
chapter.
(7)  All rights and obligations specified in Subsection (4) and Section
13-42-120 exist even if not provided in the agreement.  A provision in an
agreement which violates Subsection (4), (5), or (6) is void.
